Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.118.050

Grants, gifts, bequests, and devises.

The office of student financial assistance may accept grants, gifts, bequests, and devises of real and personal property from any source for the purpose of granting financial aid in addition to that funded by the state.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 229; 2007 c 405 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.